Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-528
Grounds; abandonment; sale; appeal.

Any person aggrieved by the order or decree of the district court in any such case shall have the right of appeal to the Court of Appeals, which appeal shall be taken within the time and proceeded with in the manner provided by law for appeals in other civil actions.

Laws 1907, c. 27, § 8, p. 150;

R.S.1913, § 695;

C.S.1922, § 604;

C.S.1929, § 13-517;

R.S.1943, § 12-528;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 17.